Utah statutes.
58-55-401.   Grounds for denial of license and disciplinary proceedings.
The division may refuse to issue a license to an applicant; refuse to renew
the license of a licensee; revoke the right of a licensee to recover from the
Residence Lien Recovery Fund created by Section 38-11-201; revoke, suspend,
restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee; issue a public or
private reprimand to a licensee; and issue a cease and desist orders order, in
accordance with Section 58-1-401.
